Louisiana, session 2026, HB538.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1631 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1631. Judicial expense fund for the Juvenile Court for the parish of East Baton
Rouge; established; disbursements
A. In addition to all other fees or costs now or hereafter provided by law, the
clerk of court of the Nineteenth Judicial District shall collect from every person
filing any action, suit, or motion and rule to show cause on the docket of the Juvenile
Court of East Baton Rouge Parish and who is not otherwise exempted exempt by law
from the payment of court costs, a sum to be determined by the chief judge of the
court, but judges of the court, sitting en banc, which sum shall not to exceed fifteen
forty-five dollars, subject, however, to the provisions of Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5181 et seq.; and in all criminal nonsupport cases over which the court has
jurisdiction, including contempt proceedings provided for by Children's Code Article
1353, there shall be taxed as costs against every defendant who is convicted after
trial or after plea of guilty or who forfeits his bond, a sum likewise determined, but
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 538 ENROLLED
not to exceed ten dollars, which shall be in addition to all other fines, costs, or
forfeitures lawfully imposed, and which shall be transmitted to the clerk for further
disposition in accordance herewith with this Section.
B. The clerk of court shall place all sums collected or received under
pursuant to this Section in a separate account to be designated as the judicial expense
fund for the Juvenile Court for the parish of East Baton Rouge. The chief judge of
the court judges, en banc, of the Juvenile Court of East Baton Rouge Parish shall
have control over the fund and all disbursements made therefrom. The chief judge
The judges shall cause to be conducted annually an audit of the fund, and the books,
and related accounts relating thereto and shall file the same a copy of the audit with
the office of the legislative auditor, where it shall be available for public inspection.
C. The chief judge judges, en banc, of the court Juvenile Court of East Baton
Rouge Parish, in lieu of all or any part of the fees for reporting and transcribing
testimony authorized under pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 13:961(F) or other
applicable laws, and in addition to salaries otherwise provided, authorized, or
established by law, may fix and pay each court reporter a salary from the judicial
expense fund. The chief judge judges, en banc, may further appoint such secretarial,
clerical, research, administrative, or other personnel necessary to expedite the
business and function of the court and fix and pay all or any part of the salaries of
such personnel out of the monies in the judicial expense fund. In like manner, the
chief judge judges, en banc, may utilize the monies in the judicial expense fund to
pay all or any part of the cost of establishing or maintaining a law library for the
court, or for buying or maintaining any type of equipment, supplies, or other items
consistent with or germane to the efficient operation of the court. In general, the
judicial expense fund is established and may be used for any purpose or purposes
connected with, incidental to, or related to the proper administration or functions of
the court, or of the office offices of the individual judge judges, and is in addition to
any and all other funds, salaries, expenses, or other monies authorized by law for any
of these purposes.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 538 ENROLLED
D. No salary shall be paid from the judicial expense fund to a judge of the
court.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.